Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-405
Local libraries, agencies, or organizations; entitled to services, when.

Any library, governmental agency, or any body of citizens or taxpayers organized for library purposes shall, upon complying with the rules prescribed by the Nebraska Library Commission, be entitled to the commission's services.

Laws 1935, c. 115, § 5, p. 371;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 51-505;

R.S.1943, § 51-405;

Laws 1972, LB 1033, § 9.